Indiana, session 2026, HB1359.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-11-10-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 26. (a) This subsection applies to all counties,
except for a county to which IC 3-6-5.2 or IC 3-6-5.6 applies. As an
alternative to voting by mail, a voter is entitled to cast an absentee
ballot before an absentee voter board at any of the following:
(1) One (1) location of the office of the circuit court clerk
designated by the circuit court clerk.
(2) A satellite office established under section 26.3 of this
chapter.
(b) This subsection applies to a county to which IC 3-6-5.2 or
IC 3-6-5.6 applies. As an alternative to voting by mail, a voter is
entitled to cast an absentee ballot before an absentee voter board at any
of the following:
(1) The office of the board of elections and registration.
(2) A satellite office established under section 26.3 of this
chapter.
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


(c) Except for a location designated under subsection (a)(1), a
location of the office of the circuit court clerk must be established as
a satellite office under section 26.3 of this chapter in order to be used
as a location at which a voter is entitled to cast an absentee ballot
before an absentee voter board under this section.
(d) The voter must do the following before being permitted to vote:
(1) This subdivision does not apply to a county that uses
electronic poll books for voting under this section. Sign an
application on the form prescribed by the election division under
IC 3-11-4-5.1. The application must be received by the circuit
court clerk not later than the time prescribed by IC 3-11-4-3.
(2) This subdivision applies only to a county that uses electronic
poll books for voting under this section and in which the ballot is
cast on an electronic voting system. The voter must do the
following:
(A) If the county election board has prescribed an affidavit
under subsection (e) that includes a unique identifier to
comply with section 26.2(c)(3) of this chapter, make and
subscribe to the affidavit.
(B) Sign the electronic poll book.
(C) Provide proof of identification.
(3) Except as provided in subdivision (4), this subdivision
applies only to a county that uses electronic poll books for voting
under this section and in which the ballot is cast on an optical
scan voting system. The voter must do the following:
(A) Sign the electronic poll book.
(B) Provide proof of identification.
(C) Sign the affidavit prescribed by section 29 of this chapter.
(4) This subdivision applies only to a county that uses
electronic poll books for voting under this section and in
which the ballot is cast on an optical scan voting system, if the
county election board has adopted a resolution under
IC 3-11-13-33.5(a). The voter must do the following:
(A) Sign the electronic poll book.
(B) Provide proof of identification.
(e) The county election board may:
(1) prescribe an affidavit that includes a unique identifier; or
(2) establish a procedure to produce a document, label, or
electronic record that is associated with each voter and includes
a unique identifier;
to comply with section 26.2(c)(3) of this chapter. After the county
election board approves an affidavit or procedure described in this
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


subsection and before the affidavit or procedure is used in an election,
the county election board shall file a copy of the affidavit or a brief
description of the procedure with the election division to assist the state
recount commission in conducting proceedings under IC 3-12-11.
(f) The voter may vote before the board not more than twenty-eight
(28) sixteen (16) days nor later than noon on the day before election
day. If the close of a voter registration period is transferred under
IC 3-5-4-1.5 from twenty-nine (29) days to a later date due to the
Columbus Day holiday, the voter may vote before the board on the first
day following the day on which the voter registration period closes.
(g) An absent uniformed services voter who is eligible to vote by
absentee ballot in the circuit court clerk's office under IC 3-7-36-14
may vote before the board not earlier than twenty-eight (28) days
before the election and not later than noon on election day. If the close
of a voter registration period is transferred under IC 3-5-4-1.5 from
twenty-nine (29) days to a later date due to the Columbus Day holiday,
the voter may vote before the board on the first day following the day
on which the voter registration period closes. If a voter described by
this subsection wishes to cast an absentee ballot during the period
beginning at noon on the day before election day and ending at noon on
election day, the county election board or absentee voter board may
receive and process the ballot at a location designated by resolution of
the county election board.
(h) The absentee voter board in the office of the circuit court clerk
must permit voters to cast absentee ballots under this section for at
least seven (7) hours on each of the two (2) Saturdays preceding
election day. However, the county election board may adopt a
resolution authorizing the circuit court clerk to:
(1) use the office of the circuit court clerk designated in
subsection (a)(1); or
(2) establish a satellite office under section 26.3 of this chapter;
to permit voters to cast absentee ballots under this section for at least
four (4) hours on the third Saturday preceding election day.
(i) Notwithstanding subsection (h), in a county with a population of
less than twenty thousand (20,000), the absentee voter board in the
office of the circuit court clerk, with the approval of the county election
board, may reduce the number of hours available to cast absentee
ballots under this section to a minimum of four (4) hours on each of the
two (2) Saturdays preceding election day.
(j) As provided by 52 U.S.C. 21081, a voter casting an absentee
ballot under this section must be:
(1) permitted to verify in a private and independent manner the
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


votes selected by the voter before the ballot is cast and counted;
(2) provided with the opportunity to change the ballot or correct
any error in a private and independent manner before the ballot is
cast and counted, including the opportunity to receive a
replacement ballot if the voter is otherwise unable to change or
correct the ballot; and
(3) notified before the ballot is cast regarding the effect of casting
multiple votes for the office and provided an opportunity to
correct the ballot before the ballot is cast and counted.
(k) As provided by 52 U.S.C. 21081, when an absentee ballot is
provided under this section, the board must also provide the voter with:
(1) information concerning the effect of casting multiple votes for
an office; and
(2) instructions on how to correct the ballot before the ballot is
cast and counted, including the issuance of replacement ballots.
(l) If:
(1) the voter is unable or declines to present the proof of
identification; or
(2) a member of the board determines that the proof of
identification provided by the voter does not qualify as proof of
identification under IC 3-5-2.1-84;
the voter shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot.
(m) This subsection applies to a voter who casts an absentee ballot
that is treated as a provisional ballot under subsection (l). The board
shall provide the voter, both orally and in writing, an explanation of
what actions, if any, the voter must take in order to have the voter's
ballot counted. The election division shall prescribe the form of the
explanation required by this subsection.
(n) A voter casting an absentee ballot under this section is entitled
to cast the voter's ballot in accordance with IC 3-11-9.
(o) The following apply in a primary election:
(1) A voter entitled to cast an absentee ballot before an absentee
voter board under this section shall mark the voter's political party
ballot selection on the electronic poll book instead of
communicating the selection to the poll clerks.
(2) A voter casting an absentee ballot under this chapter may not
change the voter's choice of the voter's political party after the
voter has been mailed or otherwise provided with a primary ballot
containing the candidates of that party.
SECTION 2. IC 3-11-10-26.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2021,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 26.4. (a) Except as provided in subsection
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


(b), this section applies to voting under section 26, 26.2, or 26.3 of this
chapter.
(b) The following apply to a county in which the county election
board has adopted a resolution under IC 3-11-13-33.5(a):
(1) This section does not apply to voting under section 26 or
26.3 of this chapter.
(2) The procedures described in IC 3-11-13-33.5 apply to
voting under section 26 or 26.3 of this chapter.
(b) (c) After voting, a voter shall leave the office or satellite office.
(c) (d) If a voter leaves the booth without casting a ballot, an
absentee voter board member or the circuit court clerk's office shall do
both of the following:
(1) Attempt to advise the voter not to leave the clerk's office or
satellite office because the voter's ballot has not been cast.
(2) Permit the voter to return to the booth to complete the process
of casting the voter's ballot.
(d) (e) This subsection applies to a voter who has been provided a
paper absentee ballot or optical scan ballot card absentee ballot. If the
voter has left the clerk's office or satellite office, or declines to return
to the booth, the absentee voter board members shall do the following:
(1) Enter into the booth and place the voter's ballot inside the
envelope provided or fold the ballot as described in
IC 3-11-13-18(b)(1).
(2) Transfer or deposit the envelope or folded ballot to the
location where previously cast absentee ballots have been
secured.
(3) Promptly complete a form prescribed under IC 3-5-4-8
containing the following information:
(A) The name of the voter who left the clerk's office or satellite
office without completing the process of casting a ballot if the
voter's name is known.
(B) The approximate time that the voter left the clerk's office
or satellite office.
(C) Whether the voter was advised that the voter could return
to the booth to complete the casting of the ballot.
(D) A statement made under the penalties for perjury
indicating that:
(i) the absentee voter board members jointly transferred or
deposited the envelope or folded ballot in the location where
previously cast absentee ballots had been secured; and
(ii) the absentee voter board members (and any other
person) did not make any alterations to the choices made by
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


the voter.
The form must be signed by both members of the absentee voter
board.
(e) (f) This subsection applies to a voter who has been provided an
electronic voting system to cast an absentee ballot. If the voter has left
the clerk's office or satellite office, or declines to return to the booth,
the absentee voter board members shall:
(1) enter into the booth;
(2) complete the process of casting the ballot for the voter; and
(3) complete the form described in subsection (d)(3). (e)(3).
(f) (g) After the voter's ballot has been transferred or deposited
under subsection (d) (e) or cast under subsection (e), (f), the absentee
voter board shall indicate on the electronic poll book or in the statewide
voter registration system that the voter has cast an absentee ballot.
SECTION 3. IC 3-11-10-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2023,
SECTION 85, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 27. (a) This section does not apply to a ballot
mailed to a voter under this chapter.
(b) Subject to IC 3-5-4-9, before a ballot is voted under section 25
of this chapter before an absentee voter board, it must bear the circuit
court clerk's official seal and signature or facsimile signature and be
initialed by the absentee voter board visiting the voter under section
25(b) of this chapter (except in a county subject to subsection (e)).
(c) Subject to IC 3-5-4-9, before a ballot is:
(1) voted under section 26 or 26.3 of this chapter; or
(2) placed:
(A) in a secrecy envelope; or
(B) into the optical scan ballot scanner under
IC 3-11-13-33.5;
if it has been marked using a marking device for an optical scan
ballot;
the ballot must bear the circuit court clerk's official seal and signature
or facsimile signature. The absentee ballot must be initialed by both
absentee voter board members, or subject to subsection (e), the county
election board or the board's designated representatives under
IC 3-11-4-19. In a county that provides a ballot marking device
described in IC 3-11-13-7.5 for a voter to mark the voter's ballot while
voting under section 26 or 26.3 of this chapter, the initials of the
absentee voter board may be applied after the ballot has been marked
by the voter and in a manner where the absentee voter board cannot see
how the voter marked the voter's ballot.
(d) An absentee voter board member or county election board
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


member or the member's representative shall not place the individual's
initials on the absentee ballot:
(1) until after the voter's application for that ballot has been
approved; or
(2) more than twenty-four (24) hours before the absentee ballot is
provided to the voter.
A ballot initialed under this subsection must be under the control of
two (2) individual members or representatives of opposite political
parties until the ballot is provided to the voter.
(e) A county election board may adopt a resolution providing that
the absentee ballots to be voted before an absentee voter board visiting
the voter under section 25(b) of this chapter must be initialed by the
county election board or the board's representatives under IC 3-11-4-19
and not by the absentee voter board visiting the voter. A resolution
adopted under this subsection remains in effect until rescinded by the
county election board. The election board may not rescind the
resolution during the final sixty (60) days before an election.
(f) The initials must be:
(1) in ink on the back of the ballot, in the person's ordinary
handwriting or printing, and without a distinguishing mark of any
kind; or
(2) in a vote center county using an electronic poll list:
(A) printed on the back of the ballot by a printer separate from
the electronic poll list, immediately before the ballot is
delivered to the voter; and
(B) the initials of the county election board or the board's
representatives captured through the electronic signature pad
or tablet at the time the county election board or the board's
representatives log into the electronic poll book system.
(g) A resolution adopted under subsection (e) may also provide that
a precinct designation is not required to be preprinted on absentee
ballots printed immediately before the ballot is delivered to a voter, but
may be added in the same manner as the initials of the county election
board or the board's representatives under IC 3-11-4-19 are added
under subsection (f).
(h) No other initialing of the absentee ballot is necessary.
SECTION 4. IC 3-11-10-28, AS AMENDED BY P.L.65-2024,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 28. (a) A voter voting before an absentee
voter board shall mark the voter's ballot in the presence of the board,
but not in such a manner that either of the members of the board can
see for whom the voter voted, unless the voter requests the help of the
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


board in marking a ballot under IC 3-11-9. The voter shall fold each
ballot separately in a manner to conceal the voter's markings.
(b) Except as provided in IC 3-11-13-33.5, the voter shall then, in
the presence of the board, place the ballot in an envelope furnished by
the county election board.
(c) The circuit court clerk shall provide, to the extent practicable,
the same degree of privacy to absentee voters voting at the office of the
circuit court clerk as provided to voters at the polls on election day.
(d) This subsection applies to a voter required to present additional
information under IC 3-7-33-4.5 or IC 3-7-33-4.7. If the voter does not
present the required additional information before receiving the
absentee ballot, the absentee ballot shall be processed in accordance
with IC 3-11.5-4-3.5.
(e) This subsection applies to a voter required to present additional
information under IC 3-7-33-4.5 or IC 3-7-33-4.7. Upon accepting the
completed absentee ballot from the voter, the board shall provide the
voter with a notice:
(1) listing the documentation the voter may submit to the county
voter registration office to comply with IC 3-7-33-4.5 or
IC 3-7-33-4.7; and
(2) stating the address and hours of the county voter registration
office.
SECTION 5. IC 3-11-13-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.193-2021,
SECTION 51, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 19. (a) Each circuit court clerk shall have
printed on each ballot used in a precinct the precinct number or
designation.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), through (e), each
circuit court clerk shall print or stamp the precinct number or
designation and a line for each poll clerk's initials on both a ballot card
and the ballot card's secrecy envelope before the election.
(c) In a vote center county using an electronic poll list, the circuit
court clerk shall not print or stamp the poll clerk's initials required by
subsection (b) if the printed initials of the poll clerks captured through
the electronic signature pad or tablet at the time the poll clerks log into
the electronic poll book system are printed by a printer separate from
the electronic poll list on the back of each ballot card immediately
before the ballot card is delivered to the voter.
(d) In a vote center county using an electronic poll book, the circuit
court clerk may print or stamp the precinct number or designation:
(1) before the election as provided by subsection (b); or
(2) at the time the ballot card is printed immediately before the
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


ballot card is delivered to a voter as provided by subsection (c).
(e) In a county in which the county election board has adopted
a resolution under section 33.5(a) of this chapter, the circuit court
clerk is not required to print or stamp the precinct number or
designation and a line for each poll clerk's initials on the ballot
card's secrecy envelope before the election.
SECTION 6. IC 3-11-13-28.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2015,
SECTION 191, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 28.7. (a) This section does not
apply to a county in which the county election board has adopted
a resolution under section 33.5(a) of this chapter.
(a) (b) The two (2) poll clerks of each precinct shall place their
initials in ink on the secrecy envelope of a ballot card (or on the
fold-over part of a ballot card described in section 18(b)(1) of this
chapter) at the time the card is issued to a voter. The initials must be in
the poll clerk's ordinary handwriting or printing and without a
distinguishing mark of any kind.
(b) (c) This subsection is enacted to comply with 52 U.S.C. 21081
by establishing uniform and nondiscriminatory standards to define
what constitutes a vote on an optical scan voting system. A write-in
vote cast on a secrecy envelope or fold-over envelope:
(1) is not valid unless:
(A) the secrecy envelope is initialed by both poll clerks; and
(B) the vote includes both the name of the write-in candidate
and the office for which the write-in vote is cast; and
(2) makes the secrecy envelope or fold-over envelope a ballot for
purposes of this title.
SECTION 7. IC 3-11-13-33, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 33. (a) This section does not apply to a
county in which the county election board has adopted a resolution
under section 33.5(a) of this chapter.
(a) (b) After a voter has marked a ballot card, the voter shall place
it inside the envelope provided for this purpose or fold the ballot
described in section 18(b)(1) of this chapter and return the ballot card
to the judge.
(b) (c) The judge shall offer to return the envelope with the ballot
card inside to the voter. The voter shall:
(1) accept the envelope and deposit it in the ballot box; or
(2) decline the envelope and require the judge to deposit it in the
ballot box.
(c) (d) If a voter offers to vote a ballot card that is not inside the
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


envelope provided for this purpose or with the ballot not folded as
described in section 18(b)(1) of this chapter, the precinct election board
shall direct the voter to return to the booth and place the ballot card in
the envelope provided for this purpose or fold the ballot. After voting,
a voter shall leave the polls.
(d) (e) If a voter leaves the booth without casting a ballot, a precinct
election official shall:
(1) attempt to advise the voter not to leave the polls because the
voter's ballot has not been cast; and
(2) permit the voter to return to the booth to complete the process
of casting the voter's ballot.
(e) (f) If the voter has left the polls, or declines to return to the
booth, the inspector shall direct both judges to do the following:
(1) Enter into the booth and place the voter's ballot inside the
envelope provided or fold the ballot as described in section
18(b)(1) of this chapter.
(2) Give the envelope or folded ballot to the inspector.
The inspector shall then deposit the voter's ballot in the ballot box.
(f) (g) After the voter's ballot has been deposited in the ballot box,
the judges and the inspector shall promptly complete a form prescribed
under IC 3-5-4-8 containing the following information:
(1) The name of the voter who left the polls without completing
the process of casting a ballot if the voter's name is known.
(2) The approximate time that the voter left the polls.
(3) Whether the voter was advised that the voter could return to
the booth to complete the casting of the ballot.
(4) A statement made under the penalties for perjury indicating
that:
(A) the judges gave the voter's ballot to the inspector;
(B) the inspector deposited the voter's ballot in the ballot box;
and
(C) the judges and the inspector did not make any alteration to
the choices made by the voter.
The form must be signed by both judges and the inspector.
(g) (h) After a voter's ballot cards have been deposited in the ballot
box, the poll clerks shall make a voting mark after the voter's name on
the poll list.
SECTION 8. IC 3-11-13-33.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 33.5. (a) This section applies
to a county in which the county election board has adopted a
resolution to use the procedures set forth in this section. However,
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


a county election board may not use the procedures set forth in this
section unless the voting system used by the county includes a
feature that allows the retraction of votes scanned into the voting
system in the manner required under IC 3-11-15-26 and
IC 3-11.5-4-6. If a county election board adopts a resolution under
this subsection, the procedures set forth in this section apply on
election day and during the period of early voting before an
absentee voter board under IC 3-11-10-26.
(b) For purposes of this section, "precinct election officer"
includes a member of the absentee voter board when voting is
occurring during the period of early voting before an absentee
voter board under IC 3-11-10-26.
(c) After a voter has marked a ballot card, the voter shall return
the ballot card to the precinct election officer assigned to receive
voted ballot cards.
(d) If the ballot card does not contain the initials of the:
(1) absentee voter board members under IC 3-11-10-27; or
(2) poll clerks under section 28.1 or 28.2 of this chapter;
the precinct election officer to which the ballot is returned shall
ensure that the two (2) poll clerks of the precinct or the members
of the absentee voter board, as applicable, place their initials on the
back of the ballot card in accordance with IC 3-11-10-27 or section
28.1(b) of this chapter.
(e) If the ballot card contains the initials of the poll clerks under
subsection (d), the precinct election officer to which the ballot is
returned shall instruct the voter to place the ballot into the optical
scan ballot scanner. If necessary, a precinct election officer shall
assist the voter with placing the ballot into the optical scan ballot
scanner.
(f) After the voter's ballot is placed into the optical scan ballot
scanner under subsection (e), the voter shall leave the polls.
(g) If a voter leaves the booth without casting a ballot, a precinct
election officer shall:
(1) attempt to advise the voter not to leave the polls because
the voter's ballot has not been cast; and
(2) permit the voter to return to the booth to complete the
process of casting the voter's ballot.
(h) This subsection applies during the period of early voting. If
the voter has left the polls, or declines to return to the booth, the
members of the absentee voter board shall do the following:
(1) Enter into the booth and place the voter's ballot inside an
envelope or fold the ballot as described in section 18(b)(1) of
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


this chapter.
(2) Deposit the voter's ballot in a ballot box separate from the
optical scan ballot scanner into which ballots have been
scanned under subsection (e).
(i) This subsection applies on election day. If the voter has left
the polls, or declines to return to the booth, the inspector shall
direct both judges to do the following:
(1) Enter into the booth and place the voter's ballot inside an
envelope or fold the ballot as described in section 18(b)(1) of
this chapter.
(2) Give the envelope or folded ballot to the inspector.
The inspector shall then deposit the voter's ballot in a ballot box
separate from the optical scan ballot scanner into which ballots
have been scanned under subsection (e).
(j) After the voter's ballot has been deposited in the ballot box
under subsection (h) or (i), the judges and the inspector, or the
members of the absentee voter board, as applicable, shall promptly
complete a form prescribed under IC 3-5-4-8 containing the
following information:
(1) The name of the voter who left the polls without
completing the process of casting a ballot if the voter's name
is known.
(2) The approximate time that the voter left the polls.
(3) Whether the voter was advised that the voter could return
to the booth to complete the casting of the ballot.
(4) If the form is completed by the judges and the inspector,
a statement made under the penalties for perjury indicating
that:
(A) the judges gave the voter's ballot to the inspector;
(B) the inspector deposited the voter's ballot in the ballot
box; and
(C) the judges and the inspector did not make any
alteration to the choices made by the voter.
(5) If the form is completed by the members of the absentee
voter board, a statement made under the penalties for perjury
indicting that:
(A) the absentee voter board members jointly deposited the
envelope or folded ballot in the ballot box; and
(B) the absentee voter board members (and any other
person) did not make any alterations to the choices made
by the voter.
The form must be signed by the judge and the inspector or both
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


members of the absentee voter board.
(k) After a voter's ballot cards have been scanned into the
optical scan ballot scanner or deposited in the ballot box, the poll
clerks or the members of the absentee voter board shall indicate on
the poll list or the electronic poll book that the voter cast a ballot
or absentee ballot, as applicable.
(l) Ballot cards that have been scanned into the optical scan
ballot scanner shall be processed and tabulated according to this
article in accordance with IC 3-11.5-9. Ballot cards under
subsection (h) or (i) shall be processed and tabulated under
IC 3-11.5-4-11 through IC 3-11.5-4-12.
SECTION 9. IC 3-11.5-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.108-2021,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 6. (a) Each circuit court clerk shall keep all
accepted ballot envelopes securely sealed in the clerk's office until the
ballot envelopes are opened by absentee ballot counters in accordance
with this chapter.
(b) A county election board may scan a voted absentee ballot card
using an optical scan ballot scanner not earlier than seven (7) calendar
days before election day. the first day of early voting before an
absentee voter board under IC 3-11-10-26. However, the county
election board:
(1) may not tabulate the ballots before election day; and
(2) shall retract a previously scanned absentee ballot card of a
voter who is later found disqualified or whose ballot may not be
counted for any other reason under this title.
SECTION 10. IC 3-11.5-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2023,
SECTION 115, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) This section does not
apply to an absentee ballot that has been scanned into an optical
scan ballot scanner under IC 3-11-13-33.5(e).
(a) (b) Upon receipt of the absentee ballot and not later than election
day, the county election board shall examine the signature on the
absentee ballot.
(b) (c) This subsection applies to a county that has not adopted an
order to use an electronic poll book under IC 3-7-29-6(a)(1) or is a vote
center county under IC 3-11-18.1. Except as provided in subsection (c),
(d), or (e), or (f), at any time after the couriers return the certificate
under section 9 of this chapter, absentee ballot counters appointed
under section 22 of this chapter, in the presence of the county election
board, shall, except for a ballot rejected under section 13 of this
chapter:
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


(1) open the outer or carrier envelope containing an absentee
ballot envelope and application;
(2) announce the absentee voter's name; and
(3) compare the signature upon the ballot application or, if there
is no application, with the signature on the electronic poll book
with the signature upon the:
(A) voter's absentee ballot envelope; or
(B) if there is no envelope, computerized list.
(c) (d) This subsection applies to a county (other than a county
described in subsection (d) (e) or (e)) (f)) that:
(1) has adopted an order to use an electronic poll book under
IC 3-7-29-6(a)(1); or
(2) is a vote center county under IC 3-11-18.1;
and has not updated the computerized list to reflect absentee ballots
received on election day. After the receipt and processing required
under sections 12 and 12.5 of this chapter to process an absentee ballot
from a voter and after ensuring that the electronic poll books used in
each polling place or vote center have been updated to reflect all
absentee ballots received by the county not later than 12:01 a.m. on
election day, the absentee ballot counters shall, at any time after 6:00
a.m. on election day, in a central counting location designated by the
county election board, count the absentee ballot votes cast for each
candidate, for each office, and on each public question.
(d) (e) This subsection applies to a county having a consolidated
city, if the county:
(1) has adopted an order to use an electronic poll book under
IC 3-7-29-6(a)(1); or
(2) is a vote center county under IC 3-11-18.1.
After the receipt and processing required under sections 12 and 12.5 of
this chapter to process an absentee ballot from a voter and after
ensuring that the electronic poll books used in each polling place or
vote center have been updated to reflect all absentee ballots received
by the county not later than 12:01 a.m. on election day, the absentee
ballot counters shall, at any time after 6:00 a.m. on election day, in a
central counting location designated by the county election board,
count the absentee ballot votes cast for each candidate, for each office,
and on each public question.
(e) (f) This subsection applies to a county other than a county
having a consolidated city, if the county election board has adopted a
resolution by the unanimous vote of the entire membership of the board
to use procedures set forth in this subsection, and the county:
(1) has adopted an order to use an electronic poll book under
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


IC 3-7-29-6(a)(1); or
(2) is a vote center county under IC 3-11-18.1.
After the receipt and processing required under section 12 of this
chapter to process an absentee ballot from a voter and after ensuring
that the electronic poll books used in each polling place or vote center
have been updated to reflect all absentee ballots received by the county
not later than 12:01 a.m. on election day, the absentee ballot counters
shall, at any time after 6:00 a.m. on election day, in a central counting
location designated by the county election board, count the absentee
ballot votes cast for each candidate, for each office, and on each public
question.
(f) (g) A resolution adopted under subsection (e) (f) may be repealed
or amended only by the unanimous vote of the entire membership of
the county election board.
SECTION 11. IC 3-11.5-4-11.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.108-2021,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.5. (a) This section applies to a county if the
county election board has adopted a resolution by the unanimous vote
of the entire membership of the board to use the procedures set forth in
this section, and the county:
(1) has adopted an order to use an electronic poll book under
IC 3-7-29-6(a)(1); or
(2) is a vote center county under IC 3-11-18.1.
(b) This section does not apply to an absentee ballot that has
been scanned into an optical scan ballot scanner under
IC 3-11-13-33.5(e).
(b) (c) Absentee ballot counters appointed under section 22 of this
chapter shall, in the presence of the county election board, process an
absentee ballot of a voter as follows:
(1) Beginning at noon, three (3) days before the election for any
absentee ballot that has been received by the county election
board not later than noon, four (4) days before the election.
(2) Beginning at noon, two (2) days before the election for any
absentee ballot that has been received by the county election
board any time after noon, four (4) days before the election and
not later than noon, three (3) days before the election.
(3) Beginning at noon, the day before the election for any
absentee ballot that has been received by the county election
board any time after noon, three (3) days before the election and
not later than noon, two (2) days before the election.
(c) (d) A team of absentee ballot counters shall do all of the
following:
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


(1) Conduct a review of the absentee ballot required by section
12(a) through 12(c) of this chapter. Section 12(e) and 12(f) of this
chapter apply to this subdivision.
(2) Determine in accordance with section 13 of this chapter if the
absentee ballot cannot be counted.
(3) Open the envelope containing the absentee ballot in a manner
that does not deface or destroy the affidavit and take out each
ballot enclosed without unfolding or permitting the ballot to be
unfolded or examined.
(4) Determine if the absentee ballot has been endorsed with the
initials of:
(A) the two (2) members of the absentee voter board in the
office of the clerk of the circuit court under IC 3-11-4-19 or
IC 3-11-10-27;
(B) the two (2) members of the absentee voter board visiting
the voter under IC 3-11-10-25; or
(C) the two (2) appointed members of the county election
board or the members' designated representatives under
IC 3-11-4-19.
(d) (e) If the team of absentee ballot counters determines the
absentee ballot can be counted under this chapter, the absentee ballot
must be stored in an envelope or container kept for ballots of the same
precinct. The envelope or container must:
(1) have the name of the precinct written on the envelope or
container; and
(2) be stored in a secure manner under dual lock controlled by
both appointed members of the county election board.
(e) (f) An absentee ballot determined to be counted under this
section shall be tabulated according to this article on election day in
accordance with section 11 of this chapter.
(f) (g) A member of the county election board may challenge a voter
under section 15(c) of this chapter when a team of absentee ballot
counters is processing an absentee ballot under this section.
SECTION 12. IC 3-11.5-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 9. Counting of Scanned Optical Scan Absentee Ballots
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to an absentee ballot that has been
scanned into an optical scan ballot scanner under
IC 3-11-13-33.5(e).
Sec. 2. (a) The county election board shall make an initial
determination concerning whether any absentee ballot cast must
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


be rejected for any grounds under IC 3-11.5-4-13.
(b) If the county election board makes an initial determination
under subsection (a) that an absentee ballot must be rejected, the
county election board shall void the absentee ballot on the optical
scan ballot scanner by retracting the absentee ballot from the
voting system.
Sec. 3. After making an initial determination under section 2 of
this chapter, the county election board shall process the remaining
absentee ballots by producing a printout for each precinct in which
an absentee ballot has been cast.
Sec. 4. After making an initial determination under section 2 of
this chapter and processing the ballots under section 3 of this
chapter, the county election board shall tabulate the valid absentee
ballots scanned into the optical scan ballot scanner.
SECTION 13. An emergency is declared for this act.
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Elections and Apportionment, to
which was referred House Bill 1359, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Replace the effective dates in SECTIONS 1 through 12 with
"[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]".
Page 2, delete lines 36 through 40.
Page 13, delete lines 11 through 20.
Page 13, line 21, delete "(m)" and insert "(l)".
Page 17, after line 28, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 13. An emergency is declared for this act.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1359 as introduced.)
WESCO
Committee Vote: yeas 9, nays 3.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Elections, to which was
referred House Bill No. 1359, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 3, line 5, strike "twenty-eight".
Page 3, line 6, strike "(28)" and insert "sixteen (16)".
Page 3, line 6, strike "If the".
Page 3, strike lines 7 through 10.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1359 as printed January 14, 2026.)
GASKILL, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 2.
EH 1359—LS 7062/DI 144